apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_adj.ca.dix
<pardef n="fict/ici__adj"><e><p><l>ícies</l><r>ici<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ícia</l><r>ici<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>icis</l><r>ici<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ici</l><r>ici<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="esc/às__adj"><e><p><l>asses</l><r>às<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>assa</l><r>às<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>assos</l><r>às<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>às</l><r>às<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="m/utu__adj"><e><p><l>útues</l><r>utu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>útua</l><r>utu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>utus</l><r>utu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>utu</l><r>utu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="lle/ig__adj"><e><p><l>tges</l><r>ig<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>tja</l><r>ig<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>tjos</l><r>ig<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ig</l><r>ig<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>tgíssimes</l><r>ig<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>tgíssima</l><r>ig<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>tgíssims</l><r>ig<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>tgíssim</l><r>ig<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="perp/etu__adj"><e><p><l>ètues</l><r>etu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ètua</l><r>etu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>etus</l><r>etu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>etu</l><r>etu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="bo/ig__adj"><e><p><l>ges</l><r>ig<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ja</l><r>ig<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>jos</l><r>ig<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ig</l><r>ig<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="af/í__adj"><e><p><l>ins</l><r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ins</l><r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>í</l><r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>í</l><r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="taur/í__adj"><e><p><l>es</l><r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>a</l><r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>s</l><r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>í</l><r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="m/urri__adj"><e><p><l>úrries</l><r>urri<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>úrria</l><r>urri<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>urris</l><r>urri<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>urri</l><r>urri<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="eg/ipci__adj"><e><p><l>ípcies</l><r>ipci<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ípcia</l><r>ipci<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ipcis</l><r>ipci<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ipci</l><r>ipci<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="gal__adj"><e><p><l>·les</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>·la</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="alacant/í__adj"><e><p><l>ines</l><r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ina</l><r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ins</l><r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>í</l><r>í<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="bas/c__adj"><e><p><l>ques</l><r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ca</l><r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>cos</l><r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e r="LR"><p><l>cs</l><r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>c</l><r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="andal/ús__adj"><e><p><l>uses</l><r>ús<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>usa</l><r>ús<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>usos</l><r>ús<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ús</l><r>ús<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>


 <pardef n="c/òmode__adj">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>òmodes</l>
          <r>òmode<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>òmoda</l>
          <r>òmode<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>òmodes</l>
          <r>òmode<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>òmode</l>
          <r>òmode<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omodíssimes</l>
          <r>òmode<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

     <e>
        <p>
          <l>omodíssima</l>
          <r>òmode<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omodíssims</l>
          <r>òmode<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omodíssim</l>
          <r>òmode<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="/indi__adj">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>índies</l>
          <r>indi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>índia</l>
          <r>indi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indis</l>
          <r>indi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>indi</l>
          <r>indi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pr/evi__adj">

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>èvies</l>
          <r>evi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>èvia</l>
          <r>evi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evis</l>
          <r>evi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evi</l>
          <r>evi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>



<!--paradigmes anteriors adj -->
<pardef n="abdominal__adj">     
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="me/u__adj">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ves</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>va</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<e lm="meu"><i>me</i><par n="me/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="teu"><i>te</i><par n="me/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="seu"><i>se</i><par n="me/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nul"><i>nul</i><par n="gal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="egipci"><i>eg</i><par n="eg/ipci__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tranquil"><i>tranquil</i><par n="gal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="murri"><i>m</i><par n="m/urri__adj"/></e>
<e lm="illegible"><i>illegible</i><par n="abdominal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fosc"><i>fos</i><par n="bas/c__adj"/></e>
<e lm="argelí"><i>argel</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="observable"><i>observable</i><par n="abdominal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fal·lible"><i>fal·lible</i><par n="abdominal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="premolar"><i>premolar</i><par n="abdominal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="diví"><i>div</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="marroquí"><i>marroqu</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="monegasc"><i>monegas</i><par n="bas/c__adj"/></e>
<e lm="microcristal·lí"><i>microcristal·l</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="haploide"><i>haploide</i><par n="abdominal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="novel·lesc"><i>novel·les</i><par n="bas/c__adj"/></e>
<e lm="endocrí"><i>endocr</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="alpí"><i>alp</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fragant"><i>fragant</i><par n="abdominal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="palatí"><i>palat</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="conjugable"><i>conjugable</i><par n="abdominal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="filipí"><i>filip</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="factici"><i>fact</i><par n="fict/ici__adj"/></e>
<e lm="argentí"><i>argent</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tosc"><i>tos</i><par n="bas/c__adj"/></e>
<e lm="immaterial"><i>immaterial</i><par n="abdominal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="alcalí"><i>alcal</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lleoní"><i>lleon</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="femení"><i>femen</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="agradable"><i>agradable</i><par n="abdominal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="macrocristal·lí"><i>macrocristal·l</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uterí"><i>uter</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="infraorbital"><i>infraorbital</i><par n="abdominal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gegantí"><i>gegant</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cavalleresc"><i>cavalleres</i><par n="bas/c__adj"/></e>
<e lm="afí"><i>af</i><par n="af/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="maxil·lar"><i>maxil·lar</i><par n="abdominal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="masculí"><i>mascul</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nupcial"><i>nupcial</i><par n="abdominal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="matutí"><i>matut</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="adventici"><i>advent</i><par n="fict/ici__adj"/></e>
<e lm="difús"><i>dif</i><par n="andal/ús__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dissonant"><i>dissonant</i><par n="abdominal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bielorús"><i>bielor</i><par n="andal/ús__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fictici"><i>fict</i><par n="fict/ici__adj"/></e>
<e lm="columnar"><i>columnar</i><par n="abdominal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="intrús"><i>intr</i><par n="andal/ús__adj"/></e>
<e lm="caní"><i>can</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="luminescent"><i>luminescent</i><par n="abdominal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="escàs"><i>esc</i><par n="esc/às__adj"/></e>
<e lm="plateresc"><i>plateres</i><par n="bas/c__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mutu"><i>m</i><par n="m/utu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="confús"><i>conf</i><par n="andal/ús__adj"/></e>
<e lm="infraroig"><i>infraro</i><par n="bo/ig__adj"/></e>
<e lm="conjuntival"><i>conjuntival</i><par n="abdominal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lleig"><i>lle</i><par n="lle/ig__adj"/></e>
<e lm="submarí"><i>submar</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="perpetu"><i>perp</i><par n="perp/etu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="isoclí"><i>isocl</i><par n="alacant/í__adj"/></e>
<e lm="boig"><i>bo</i><par n="bo/ig__adj"/></e>
<e lm="subreptici"><i>subrept</i><par n="fict/ici__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aglutinant"><i>aglutinant</i><par n="abdominal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="obtús"><i>obt</i><par n="andal/ús__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fresc"><i>fres</i><par n="bas/c__adj"/></e>
<e lm="incòmode"><i>inc</i><par n="c/òmode__adj"/></e>
<e lm="indi"><i></i><par n="/indi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mòbil"><i>mòbil</i><par n="abdominal__adj"/></e>
<e lm="previ"><i>pr</i><par n="pr/evi__adj"/></e>
